Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2616
Person; not acting as insurance consultant; when.

A person shall not be deemed to be acting as an insurance consultant under any of the following circumstances:

(1) If a licensed agent gives advice incidental to the normal course of the agent's insurance business and does not charge a fee other than commissions received from insurance written;

(2) If any attorney, actuary, certified public accountant, teacher of insurance, or trust officer of a bank consults during the normal course of his or her usual business, and only incidental to such business; or

(3) If a person employed as a risk manager consults during the normal course of his or her full-time employment to the company by which such person is employed.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 11.